Connecticut, session 2026, SB00155.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than October 15,
2027, and annually thereafter, the Department of Children and Families
shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes, to the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children and
appropriations concerning the business of the department during the
preceding fiscal year. Such report shall not contain personally
identifying information and shall include, but need not be limited to:
(1) Data illustrating the utilization of the department's services by
race and ethnicity, an assessment of any trends in such utilization and
recommendations for results-based accountability measures to ensure
parity in access to such services;
(2) Data sufficient to demonstrate the Commissioner of Children and
Families' compliance with the provisions of subsections (a), (c) and (e)
of section 17a-10a of the general statutes, as amended by this act,
including the (A) total number of children who have one or more

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
siblings and are in the care and custody of the commissioner pursuant
to temporary placements or orders of commitment, (B) total number of
such children who have had documented sibling visitation, and (C)
number of sibling pairs involved in each placement;
(3) Information regarding the facilities enumerated in section 17a-32
of the general statutes, including (A) aggregate profiles of the residents
of such facilities, (B) descriptions of and updates concerning major
initiatives affecting such facilities, (C) the outcomes and benefits derived
from such initiatives, (D) costs associated with operating each such
facility, and (E) descriptions of educational, vocational and literacy
programs and behavioral, treatment and other services available to
residents of such facilities and the outcomes associated with such
programs and services;
(4) The number of written reports concerning suspected animal harm,
neglect or cruelty (A) made by employees of the department pursuant
to section 17a-100a of the general statutes, and (B) indicated in reports
received by the commissioner pursuant to section 22-329b of the general
statutes;
(5) Information regarding the department's family assessment
response program established pursuant to section 17a-101g of the
general statutes, as amended by this act, including (A) the number of
accepted reports of child abuse or neglect and the percentage of such
reports assigned to such program, (B) the disposition of families
assigned to such program, (C) the number of each type of reporter who
made reports that were assigned to such program, (D) the number and
percentage of reports assigned to such program that resulted in an
investigation, (E) an analysis of the department's prior or subsequent
involvement with each family that was the subject of a report assigned
to such program, as applicable, (F) an analysis of the department's prior
or subsequent involvement with each family assigned to a community
partner agency, (G) a description of services commonly provided to
Public Act No. 26-48 2 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
families referred to the department's community support for families
program, (H) a description of the department's staff development and
training practices concerning report intake, (I) the number and
percentage of families referred to the family assessment response
program who were enrolled in the community support for families
program, (J) the reasons identified by community providers for families'
discharge from services pursuant to subdivision (7) of subsection (g) of
section 17a-101g of the general statutes, as amended by this act,
categorized by race and ethnicity, (K) a comparison of the family needs
identified and addressed by the department's community support for
families program, and (L) an analysis of the efficacy of the department's
risk and safety assessment practices, including information concerning
the (i) methodology used to determine the reliability of such practices,
(ii) utilization of evidence-based practices and tools, and (iii)
effectiveness of such practices for identifying children at risk for abuse
or neglect;
(6) Information regarding private providers that contract with the
department, including the (A) number of service types provided
pursuant to each provider's contract with the department and
measurable outcomes for each such type, (B) incorporation of such
outcomes into contracts, (C) achievement of such outcomes and other
quality indicators as noted in annual evaluations of each provider, and
(D) application of outcome information into quality improvement
efforts;
(7) Information regarding the (A) methods used by the department
to ensure compliance with statutory and regulatory foster care licensing
requirements, (B) methods used by the department to assess the needs
of children and youths in foster care and provide support for foster
parents to enable such parents to meet the needs of such children and
youths, (C) safeguards employed by the department when licensing
relative caregivers with histories of child abuse or neglect or psychiatric
Public Act No. 26-48 3 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
illness or criminal records, (D) processes used by the department to
reverse substantiated findings of child abuse or neglect or child abuse
and neglect registry findings with respect to prospective relative
caregivers, (E) number of reports of child abuse or neglect concerning
children and youths residing in foster homes licensed by the department
and the number of substantiated reports, (F) number of foster home
licenses revoked and foster home license applications denied by the
department, (G) results of departmental audits of licensing practices,
and (H) number and type of safety concerns with respect to licensed
foster homes identified by the department through the department's
assessment of regulatory compliance system and any corresponding
corrective actions taken;
(8) Information regarding the effectiveness of the grant program
established under subsection (b) of section 17a-22ii of the general
statutes, as amended by this act; and
(9) Information regarding the diversion of children under the age of
eighteen from the juvenile justice and court systems, including the (A)
number of times any such child was diverted, (B) total number of such
children diverted, (C) type of services provided to each such child, (D)
program or process through which each such child was diverted, and
(E) age of each such child.
Sec. 2. Section 17a-22m of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The Commissioners of Children and Families, Social Services and
Mental Health and Addiction Services shall, not later than October 1,
2026, and annually thereafter, conduct an [annual] evaluation of the
Behavioral Health Partnership and [shall] submit a report, in accordance
with section 11-4a, to the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and
the budgets of state agencies, public health, human services and
Public Act No. 26-48 4 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
children on the provision of behavioral health services under the
Behavioral Health Partnership, including information on the status of
any administrative services organization implementation, the status of
[the collaboration among] collaborative efforts between the
Departments of Children and Families, Social Services and Mental
Health and Addiction Services, the services provided, the number of
persons served, program outcomes, [and] spending by child and adult
populations and estimated cost savings, if any, resulting from the
implementation of the Behavioral Health Partnership.
Sec. 3. Section 17a-8b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The Department of Children and Families shall report any missing or
abducted child who was committed to the custody of the commissioner
to the (1) law enforcement authority having jurisdiction over the
geographical area from which the child was reported missing or was
abducted, and (2) National Center for Missing or Exploited Children.
The department shall make such report immediately, but in no case later
than twenty-four hours after the child is determined to be missing or
abducted. [, to the Federal Bureau of Investigation's National Crime
Information Center and to the National Center for Missing and
Exploited Children.]
Sec. 4. Section 10-19m of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) For the purposes of this section, "youth" means a person from birth
to eighteen years of age. Any one or more municipalities or any one or
more private youth-serving organizations, designated to act as agents
of one or more municipalities or local or regional boards of education,
may establish a multipurpose youth service bureau for the purposes of
evaluation, planning, coordination and implementation of services,
including prevention and intervention programs for delinquent,
Public Act No. 26-48 5 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
predelinquent, pregnant, parenting and troubled youths referred to
such bureau by local or regional boards of education, police, juvenile
courts, adult courts, local youth-serving agencies, parents and self-
referrals. A youth service bureau shall be the coordinating unit of
community-based services to provide comprehensive delivery of
prevention, intervention, treatment and follow-up services.
(b) A youth service bureau established pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section may provide, but shall not be limited to the delivery of, the
following services: (1) Individual and group counseling; (2) parent
training and family therapy; (3) work placement and employment
counseling; (4) alternative and special educational opportunities; (5)
recreational and youth enrichment programs; (6) outreach programs to
ensure participation and planning by the entire community for the
development of regional and community-based youth services; (7)
preventive programs, including youth pregnancy, youth suicide,
violence, alcohol and drug prevention; and (8) programs that develop
positive youth involvement. Such services shall be designed to meet the
needs of youths by the diversion of troubled youths from the justice
system as well as by the provision of opportunities for all youths to
function as responsible members of their communities.
(c) The Commissioner of Children and Families shall adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54,
establishing minimum standards for such youth service bureaus and the
criteria for qualifying for state cost-sharing grants, including, but not
limited to, allowable sources of funds covering the local share of the
costs of operating such bureaus, acceptable in-kind contributions and
application procedures. [The commissioner shall, on December 1, 2011,
and biennially thereafter, report to the General Assembly on the referral
or diversion of children under the age of eighteen years from the
juvenile justice system and the court system. Such report shall include,
but not be limited to, the number of times any child is so diverted, the
Public Act No. 26-48 6 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
number of children diverted, the type of service provided to any such
child, by whom such child was diverted, the ages of the children
diverted and such other information and statistics as the General
Assembly may request from time to time. Any such report shall contain
no identifying information about any particular child.]
Sec. 5. Section 17a-10a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Children and Families shall ensure that a
child placed in the care and custody of the commissioner pursuant to an
order of temporary custody or an order of commitment is provided
visitation with such child's parents and siblings, unless otherwise
ordered by the court.
(b) The commissioner shall ensure that such child's visits with his or
her parents, or opportunities to communicate with such child's parents
and siblings by telephonic, video or other conferencing platform in
accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of this section, shall
occur as frequently as reasonably possible, based upon consideration of
the best interests of the child, including the age and developmental level
of the child, and shall be sufficient in number and duration to ensure
continuation of the relationship.
(c) If such child has an existing relationship with a sibling and is
separated from such sibling as a result of intervention by the
commissioner including, but not limited to, placement in a foster home
or in the home of a relative, the commissioner shall, based upon
consideration of the best interests of the child, ensure that such child has
access to and visitation rights with such sibling throughout the duration
of such placement. In determining the number, frequency and duration
of sibling visits, the commissioner shall consider the best interests of
each sibling, given each child's age and developmental level and the
continuation of the sibling relationship. If the child and his or her sibling
Public Act No. 26-48 7 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
both reside within the state and within fifty miles of each other, the
commissioner shall, within available appropriations, ensure that such
child's visits with his or her sibling occur, on average, not less than once
per week, unless the commissioner finds that the frequency of such
visitation is not in the best interests of each sibling.
(d) In the event of a pandemic or outbreak of a communicable disease
resulting in a declaration of a public health emergency by the Governor
pursuant to section 19a-131a, or a declaration of a national emergency
by the President of the United States, such child shall be provided
opportunities to communicate with such child's parents and siblings by
telephonic, video or other conferencing platform in lieu of in-person
visitation, for the duration of any such declaration. Not later than
January 1, 2022, the commissioner shall develop a policy that requires
the temporary cessation of in-person visitation provided pursuant to
this section, on a case-by-case basis, in the event that a child or such
child's parent or sibling is seriously ill due to a communicable disease,
and visitation could result in the contraction of such disease by one or
more participants in the visitation. Such policy shall require that such
child be provided an opportunity to communicate with such child's
parents and siblings by telephonic, video or other conferencing platform
in lieu of such visitation. The commissioner shall define "seriously ill"
and "communicable disease" for the purposes of carrying out this
subsection.
(e) The commissioner shall include in each child's case record
information relating to the factors considered in making visitation
determinations pursuant to this section. If the commissioner determines
that such visits are not in the best interests of the child, that the
occurrence of, on average, not less than one visit per week with his or
her sibling is not in the best interests of each sibling, or that the number,
frequency or duration of the visits requested by the child's attorney or
guardian ad litem is not in the best interests of the child, the
Public Act No. 26-48 8 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
commissioner shall include the reasons for such determination in the
child's case record.
[(f) On or before October first of each year, the commissioner shall
report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to children, data sufficient to demonstrate compliance
with subsections (a), (c) and (e) of this section. Such data shall include
the total annual number of children in out-of-home placements who
have siblings, the total number of child cases with documented sibling
visitation and the number of individual siblings involved in each case.]
Sec. 6. Section 17a-22ii of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
1, 2026):
(a) There is established a Mental and Behavioral Health Treatment
Fund, which shall be a separate, nonlapsing account. The account shall
contain any moneys required by law to be deposited in the account, the
resources of which shall be used by the Commissioner of Children and
Families to assist families with the cost of obtaining (1) a drug or
treatment prescribed for a child by a health care provider for the
treatment of a mental or behavioral health condition if the cost of such
drug or treatment is not covered by insurance or Medicaid, and (2)
intensive evidence-based services or other intensive services to treat
mental and behavioral health conditions in children and adolescents,
including, but not limited to, intensive in-home child and adolescent
psychiatric services and services provided by an intensive outpatient
program, if the cost of such services is not covered by insurance or
Medicaid. The Commissioner of Children and Families shall establish
eligibility criteria for families to receive such assistance. Such eligibility
requirements (A) shall include that a family has sought and been denied
coverage or reimbursement for such drug or treatment or such intensive
services by the family's health carrier, and (B) may include, but need not
Public Act No. 26-48 9 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
be limited to, a family's financial need. Not later than January 1, 2023,
the Commissioner of Children and Families shall begin accepting
applications for such assistance.
(b) The Commissioner of Children and Families may accept on behalf
of the fund any federal funds or private grants or gifts made for
purposes of this section. The commissioner shall use such funds to make
grants to families for the purposes described in this section.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2023, the Departments of Children and
Families and Consumer Protection and the Office of Policy and
Management shall post in a conspicuous location on their respective
Internet web sites a description of the grant program, including, but not
limited to, the eligibility requirements and application process for the
grant program. Not later than January 1, 2023, the Department of
Children and Families shall (1) post such description on the Internet web
site administered by the department that contains information
regarding resources for connecting children and families to behavioral
health services, (2) include such description on the documents
developed by the department pursuant to section 17a-22r, and (3)
provide such description to the 2-1-1 Infoline program operated by the
United Way of Connecticut. The Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management may request that another state agency post such
description on such agency's Internet web site.
[(d) On or before January 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the
Commissioner of Children and Families shall report, in accordance with
the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public
health regarding the effectiveness of the grant program established
under subsection (b) of this section.]
Sec. 7. Subsection (g) of section 17a-101g of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
Public Act No. 26-48 10 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
2026):
(g) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) to (f),
inclusive, of this section, the commissioner may establish a program of
family assessment response to reports of child abuse and neglect
whereby the report may be referred to appropriate community
providers for family assessment and services without an investigation
or at any time during an investigation, provided there has been an initial
safety assessment of the circumstances of a family and child and
criminal background checks have been performed on all adults involved
in the report. Services provided through family assessment response
shall include an array of community-based services and supports
designed to meet the individual needs of families, build upon their
strengths, enhance child development, reduce child abuse and neglect
and increase the health, safety and well-being of children.
(2) In response to an accepted family assessment report, the
department shall conduct a comprehensive family assessment that shall
include a safety and risk assessment and an assessment of family
strengths and needs. Such assessment shall include personal interviews
with the child and the child's parent or primary caretaker, an evaluation
of the home environment and the performance of criminal background
checks on all adults residing in the same household. Such assessment
may include, as appropriate, personal interviews with other children or
adults residing in the same household as well as any other caregivers,
family members and collateral contacts. In conducting such assessment,
the department shall consider the age and vulnerability of the child,
family functioning, family history of abuse and neglect and family
history of involvement with the department. The department shall,
upon securing any necessary releases, request any relevant out-of-state
history of child abuse or neglect involving any adults residing in the
same household.
(3) The following reports of suspected child abuse or neglect shall not
Public Act No. 26-48 11 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
be referred for family assessment response: (A) Sexual abuse, (B) abuse
or neglect occurring in an out-of-home placement, (C) abuse or neglect
resulting in the death or serious physical or mental injury of a child, or
(D) where the department's safety assessment reveals that the child is
unsafe. A case supervisor or manager shall approve all referrals to
family assessment response.
(4) Prior to referring a report to an appropriate community provider,
the department shall develop a service plan designed to meet the
family's immediate needs for services and supports and to guide the
community provider's development of a long-term plan of care for the
family.
(5) Following a referral pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection,
a community provider shall schedule an in-person meeting with the
family and shall develop a plan of care. Such plan of care shall be
developed in consultation with the family and shall include (A) a review
of the department's family assessment and service plan and any services
and supports the family is currently receiving, and (B) an identification
of the family's ongoing needs and the services and supports that may be
available to meet such needs. Such plan of care shall identify the family's
strengths and needs and describe the services and supports to be offered
to (i) address the family's needs, (ii) build upon the family's strengths,
and (iii) increase the health, safety and well-being of the child. The
provider shall monitor the family's participation and progress with the
plan of care.
(6) The community provider shall maintain ongoing contact with the
family through in-person meetings, visits to the home, child and family
team meetings and phone calls. If at any time following the referral or
during the implementation of the plan of care, the provider has
reasonable cause to suspect or believe that any child under eighteen
years of age (A) has been abused or neglected, as defined in section 46b-
120, (B) has suffered a nonaccidental physical injury or an injury that is
Public Act No. 26-48 12 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
at variance with the history given for such injury, or (C) is placed at
imminent risk of serious harm, the provider shall report or cause a
report to be made in accordance with the provisions of sections 17a-101b
to 17a-101d, inclusive.
(7) The community provider shall schedule an in-person meeting
with the family prior to the end of services. The determination to end
services shall be based upon the family's preference and progress in
meeting the goals outlined in the plan of care. The community provider
shall submit individual child and family specific data and
administrative service data to the department not later than thirty days
after ending services. Such data shall identify the needs of the family,
the services and supports made available to address those needs, the
family's met and unmet treatment goals, the final disposition at the time
of ending services and the reasons for the family's discharge from
services, including, but not limited to, met treatment goals, family
relocation, the receipt of a new report by the department or transfer of
the family to another provider.
(8) Subdivisions (5) to (7), inclusive, of this subsection shall apply to
all community provider service contracts in effect on June 9, 2016, to the
extent they are not in conflict with such contracts, and shall apply to all
contracts entered into, amended, extended or renewed on or after June
9, 2016.
(9) The commissioner shall adopt procedures to establish a method
for the department to monitor the progress of the child and family
referred to a community provider pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection and to set standards for reopening an investigation pursuant
to this section. Such standards shall include, but need not be limited to,
provisions for the reassignment of a report referred for family
assessment response for an immediate investigation based on (A) a
reassessment of the initial report of child abuse or neglect or the
discovery of new or additional facts indicating that the child is unsafe,
Public Act No. 26-48 13 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
or (B) a determination that the report meets the criteria of subdivision
(3) of this subsection and, as a result, does not qualify for family
assessment response. Not later than January 1, 2017, the commissioner
shall submit a report regarding such procedures and standards, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to children.
(10) Consistent with the provisions of section 17a-28, the department
shall disclose all relevant information in its possession concerning the
child and family, including prior child protection activity, to each
provider to whom a report has been referred for use by the provider in
the assessment, diagnosis and treatment of unique needs of the family
and the prevention of future reports. Each provider who has received a
report of child abuse or neglect referred pursuant to this subsection shall
disclose to the department, consistent with the provisions of section 17a-
28, all relevant information gathered during assessment, diagnosis and
treatment of the child and family. The department may use such
information solely to monitor and ensure the continued safety and well-
being of the child or children.
[(11) Not later than July 1, 2016, and annually thereafter, the
department shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to children for inclusion in the
annual report card prepared pursuant to section 2-53m on the status of
family assessment response. Such report shall include data from the
previous calendar year, including, but not limited to: (A) The number of
accepted reports of child abuse or neglect, and the percentage of reports
assigned to the family assessment response track; (B) the disposition of
families assigned a family assessment response; (C) for cases assigned
to the family assessment response track, a breakdown by reporter type;
(D) the number and percentage of family assessment response cases that
Public Act No. 26-48 14 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
changed track to investigations; (E) an analysis of the department's prior
or subsequent involvement with a family that has been assigned to
family assessment response, if applicable; (F) an analysis of the
department's prior or subsequent involvement with a family that has
been assigned to a community partner agency; (G) a description of
services that are commonly provided to families referred to the
community support for families program; (H) a description of the
department's staff development and training practices relating to intake;
(I) the number and percentage of referred families who were ultimately
enrolled in the community support for families program; (J) the number
and percentage of families receiving a family assessment response
broken down by race and ethnicity; (K) the reason for discharge from
the community support for families program, as identified in
subdivision (7) of this subsection, broken down by race and ethnicity;
(L) a comparison of the needs identified and the needs addressed for
families referred to the community support for families program; and
(M) an analysis of the efficacy of the department's risk and safety
assessment practices, including information concerning the
methodology used to determine the reliability of such practices, the
utilization of evidence-based practices and tools, and the effectiveness
of such assessment practices for identifying children at risk for abuse or
neglect.]
Sec. 8. Subdivision (5) of subsection (j) of section 46b-129 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(5) The commissioner shall be the guardian of such child or youth for
the duration of the commitment, provided the child or youth has not
reached the age of eighteen years, or until another guardian has been
legally appointed, and in like manner, upon such vesting of the care of
such child or youth, such other public or private agency or individual
shall be the guardian of such child or youth until such child or youth
Public Act No. 26-48 15 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
has reached the age of eighteen years or, in the case of a child or youth
in full-time attendance in a secondary school, a technical education and
career school, a college or a state-accredited job training program, until
such child or youth has reached the age of twenty-one years or until
another guardian has been legally appointed. The commissioner may
place any child or youth so committed to the commissioner in a suitable
foster home or in the home of a fictive kin caregiver, relative caregiver,
or in a licensed child-caring institution or in the care and custody of any
accredited, licensed or approved child-caring agency, within or without
the state, provided a child shall not be placed outside the state except
for good cause and unless the [parent or guardian] parents or guardians
of such child are notified in advance of such placement and given an
opportunity to be heard, or in a receiving home maintained and
operated by the commissioner. When placing such child or youth, the
commissioner shall provide written notification of the placement,
including the name, address and other relevant contact information
relating to the placement, to any attorney or guardian ad litem
appointed to represent the child or youth pursuant to subsection (c) of
this section. The commissioner shall provide written notification to such
attorney or guardian ad litem of any change in placement of such child
or youth, including a hospitalization or respite placement, and if the
child or youth absconds from care. The commissioner shall provide such
written notification not later than ten business days prior to the date of
change of placement in a nonemergency situation, or not later than two
business days following the date of a change of placement in an
emergency situation. In placing such child or youth, the commissioner
shall, if possible, select a home, agency, institution or person of like
religious faith to that of a parent of such child or youth, if such faith is
known or may be ascertained by reasonable inquiry, provided such
home conforms to the standards of the commissioner and the
commissioner shall, when placing siblings, if possible, place such
children together. At least ten days prior to transferring a child or youth
to a second or subsequent placement, the commissioner shall give
Public Act No. 26-48 16 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
written notice to such child or youth and such child's or youth's attorney
of said commissioner's intention to make such transfer, unless an
emergency or risk to such child's or youth's well-being necessitates the
immediate transfer of such child or youth and renders such notice
impossible. Upon the issuance of an order committing the child or youth
to the commissioner, or not later than sixty days after the issuance of
such order, the court shall determine whether the department made
reasonable efforts to keep the child or youth with his or her [parent or
guardian] parents or guardians prior to the issuance of such order and,
if such efforts were not made, whether such reasonable efforts were not
possible, taking into consideration the child's or youth's best interests,
including the child's or youth's health and safety.
Sec. 9. Section 10a-57g of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) ["Preschool through Twenty and Workforce Information
Network" or "P20 WIN"] "Data Link Connecticut" or "DataLinkCT"
means a state integrated data system utilized for the purpose of
matching and integrating data of state agencies and other organizations
to inform policy and practice for education, workforce and supportive
service efforts.
(2) "Participating agency" means the Connecticut State Colleges and
Universities, Department of Education, Labor Department, the Office of
Early Childhood, The University of Connecticut, the Connecticut
Conference of Independent Colleges and any entity that has executed
an enterprise memorandum of understanding for participation in [the
P20 WIN] DataLinkCT and has been approved for participation
pursuant to the terms of the enterprise memorandum of understanding.
Public Act No. 26-48 17 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
(3) "Enterprise memorandum of understanding" means a
foundational multiparty agreement that sets forth the details of how
data is shared and the respective legal rights and responsibilities of each
party within the data sharing process.
(b) There is established [a Preschool through Twenty and Workforce
Information Network] Data Link Connecticut. The executive board of
[the P20 WIN] DataLinkCT, established pursuant to subsection (d) of
this section, shall establish processes and structures governing the
secure sharing of data across participating agencies.
(c) The Office of Policy and Management shall serve as the
administrator for [P20 WIN] DataLinkCT to support the executive board
and data governing board, develop procedures for secure sharing and
analysis of data and provide program management to support the
continued operation and maintenance of [P20 WIN] DataLinkCT, in
accordance with the state data plan and data sharing efforts specified in
sections 4-67n and 4-67p.
(d) [The P20 WIN] DataLinkCT shall be governed by an executive
board that shall provide oversight of such network. Said executive
board shall include, but need not be limited to, the chief executive officer
of each participating agency, or their respective designees, the Chief
Workforce Officer, or the officer's designee, and the Secretary of the
Office of Policy and Management, or the secretary's designee. The duties
of the executive board shall be to:
(1) Advance a vision for [the P20 WIN including] DataLinkCT that
includes a prioritized research agenda with support from the Office of
Policy and Management.
(2) Convene as needed to respond to issues from the data governing
board.
(3) Identify and work to secure resources necessary to sustain [P20
Public Act No. 26-48 18 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
WIN] DataLinkCT funding.
(4) Support system implementation, maintenance and improvement
by advocating for [the P20 WIN] DataLinkCT in regard to policy,
legislation and resources.
(5) Advocate for and support the state's vision for [the P20 WIN]
DataLinkCT.
(6) Establish a data governing board to establish and implement
policies related to cross-agency data management, including, but not
limited to, data confidentiality and security in alignment with the vision
for [the P20 WIN] DataLinkCT and any applicable law. In establishing
such policies, the data governing board shall consult with the Office of
Policy and Management, in accordance with the provisions of sections
4-67n and 4-67p and other applicable statutes and policies.
(e) The executive board established pursuant to this section may
appoint advisory committees to make recommendations on data
stewardship, data system expansion and processes, and such other areas
that will advance the work of [the P20 WIN] DataLinkCT.
(f) (1) Each regional workforce development board established under
section 31-3k shall regularly submit data to [the P20 WIN] DataLinkCT
to report on the performance and outcomes achieved by the state's
workforce system, including, but not limited to, workforce training and
development programs that receive federal and state funds or grants.
Not later than September 1, 2025, the Chief Workforce Officer shall, in
consultation with the Labor Commissioner, the Chief Data Officer and
the regional workforce development boards, establish standards for the
submission of data by regional workforce development boards
specifying the data to be submitted and the form and manner in which
to submit such data.
(2) On or before January 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, the Chief
Public Act No. 26-48 19 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
Workforce Officer may, in consultation with the Chief Data Officer and
the Labor Commissioner, submit to the administrator of [the P20 WIN]
DataLinkCT a request for data and analysis of such data for the
purposes of assessing performance and outcomes of the state's
workforce system. Such data and analysis request shall be completed by
the administrator of [the P20 WIN] DataLinkCT not later than August
15, 2022, and annually thereafter.
(g) Not later than October 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, each
constituent unit of the state system of higher education, as defined in
section 10a-1, and such constituent unit's central or system office, if any,
shall submit, in a manner that complies with the requirements of the
Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 USC 1232g, as amended
from time to time, data to [the P20 WIN] DataLinkCT to report on the
outcomes of postsecondary education and workforce development
programs operated by such constituent unit. Not later than September
1, 2025, the Chief Data Officer shall specify the form and manner in
which to submit such data. Any report produced from such data shall
be in aggregated form and, consistent with any other provision of state
or federal law, shall not include any personally identifiable information
of students or participants in such programs.
Sec. 10. Subsection (c) of section 4-124w of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(c) The Chief Workforce Officer may call upon any office,
department, board, commission, public institution of higher education
or other agency of the state to supply such reports, information, data
and assistance as may be reasonable, necessary and appropriate in order
to carry out the Chief Workforce Officer's or the Office of Workforce
Strategy's duties and requirements. Each officer or employee of such
office, department, board, commission, public institution of higher
education or other agency of the state shall furnish such reports,
Public Act No. 26-48 20 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
information, data and assistance as requested by the Chief Workforce
Officer, to the extent permitted under state and federal law. Any request
for data from a participating agency in [P20 WIN] DataLinkCT,
established pursuant to section 10a-57g, as amended by this act, shall be
submitted through [P20 WIN] DataLinkCT in accordance with the
policies and procedures established by [P20 WIN] DataLinkCT.
Sec. 11. Subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section 10-15o of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(2) Compile and analyze data on students and young people, through
available data systems, including, but not limited to, [the Connecticut
Preschool through Twenty and Workforce Information Network] Data
Link Connecticut, established pursuant to section 10a-57g, as amended
by this act;
Sec. 12. Subdivision (19) of subsection (b) of section 12-15 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(19) To the extent allowable under federal law, return information to
another state agency or to support a data request submitted through
[P20 WIN] DataLinkCT, established in section 10a-57g, as amended by
this act, in accordance with the policies and procedures of [P20 WIN]
DataLinkCT for the purposes of evaluation or research, provided the
recipient of such data enters into a data sharing agreement pursuant to
section 4-67aa if such recipient is not a state agency;
Sec. 13. Subsection (e) of section 17b-112l of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(e) Not later than July 1, 2020, pursuant to the advisory authority
established in section 3-125, the Office of the Attorney General, in
Public Act No. 26-48 21 of 22

Substitute Senate Bill No. 155
consultation with the Two-Generational Advisory Board, the Secretary
of the Office of Policy and Management, the Chief Data Officer
appointed pursuant to section 4-67p and [the Preschool through Twenty
and Workforce Information Network] Data Link Connecticut,
established pursuant to section 10a-57g, as amended by this act, shall
develop a uniform interagency data sharing protocol to remove legal
barriers to promote cross-agency and cross-sector collaboration under
this section to the fullest extent permitted under state and federal laws.
Sec. 14. Section 22 of public act 24-45 is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Not later than [January 1, 2025] July 1, 2027, and [annually] biennially
thereafter, the executive board of [the Connecticut Preschool Through
Twenty and Workforce Information Network] Data Link Connecticut,
established pursuant to section 10a-57g of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, shall submit [an annual] a report on disconnected
youth. In developing such report, the executive board shall use the data
model established through the data sharing agreement 0043 regarding
Research on Disengaged and Disconnected Youth in Connecticut. The
executive board shall submit such report to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to education, children, the judiciary, labor, human services,
public health and appropriations, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes. As used in this section,
"disconnected youth" has the same meaning as provided in section 21 of
[this act] public act 24-45, as amended by this act.
Sec. 15. Sections 17a-6e, 17a-22n, 17a-32a, 17a-63a, 17a-100c and 17a-
114g of the general statutes are repealed. (Effective July 1, 2026)
Governor's Action:
Approved May 26, 2026
Public Act No. 26-48 22 of 22